Louisiana, session 2026, HB85.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 3-H of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 15:564 through 564.2, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 3-H. ANIMAL ABUSE AND NEGLECT REGISTRY
§564. Registration of persons convicted of felony offenses involving the abuse,
cruelty, or death of an animal
A. Any person residing in this state who has been convicted of the
commission or conspiracy to commit, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to the
commission or conspiracy to commit, any of the following felony offenses shall be
required to register and provide notification in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter:
(1) R.S. 14:89.3 (Sexual abuse of an animal)
(2) R.S. 14:89.6 (Human-animal hybrids)
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-681 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 85
(3) R.S. 14:102.1 (Cruelty to animals; simple and aggravated)
(4) R.S. 14:102.5 (Dogfighting; training and possession of dogs for fighting)
(5) R.S. 14:102.8 (Injuring or killing of a police animal)
(6) R.S. 14:102.23 (Cockfighting)
B.(1) The court shall provide written notification to any person who is
convicted of a felony offense listed in Subsection A of this Section and the offender
shall register on the Animal Abuse and Neglect Registry upon release, or as a
condition of his probation or parole.
(2) An offender who is required to register pursuant to this Section shall
register in person with the sheriff of the parish of the person's residence, or
residences, if there is more than one, and with the chief of police if the address of
any of the person's residences is located in an incorporated area which has a police
department. If the offender resides in a municipality with a population in excess of
three hundred thousand persons, the offender shall register in person with the police
department of his municipality of residence.
C.(1) No later than three business days after release, an offender who is
required to register shall register and provide all of the following information to the
appropriate law enforcement agencies listed in Subsection B of this Section:
(a) Name and any aliases used by the offender.
(b) The offender's physical address or addresses of residence.
(c) Name and physical address of the offender's place of employment. If the
offender does not have a fixed place of employment, the offender shall provide
information with as much specificity as possible regarding the places where he
works, including but not limited to travel routes used by the offender.
(d) Name and physical address of the school in which he is a student.
(e) Two forms of proof of residence for each residential address provided,
including but not limited to a driver's license, bill for utility service, and bill for
telephone service. If those forms of proof of residence are not available, the offender
may provide an affidavit of an adult resident living at the same address. The
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-681 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 85
affidavit shall certify that the affiant understands his obligation to provide written
notice in the same manner as provided in R.S. 15:542.1.4(B) to the appropriate law
enforcement agency with whom the offender last registered when the offender no
longer resides at the residence provided in the affidavit.
(f) The crime for which the offender was convicted and the date and place
of such conviction, and if known by the offender, the court in which the conviction
was obtained, the docket number of the case, the specific statute under which he was
convicted, and the sentence imposed.
(g) A current photograph of the offender.
(h) The offender's telephone numbers, including fixed location phone and
mobile phone numbers assigned to the offender or associated with any residence
address of the offender.
(i) A description of every motorized vehicle registered to or operated by the
offender, including license plate number and vehicle identification number, and a
copy of the offender's driver's license or identification card. This information shall
be provided prior to the offender's operation of the vehicle.
(j) The offender's social security number and date of birth.
(k) A description of the physical characteristics of the offender, including but
not limited to sex, race, hair color, eye color, height, age, weight, scars, tattoos, or
other identifying marks on the body of the offender.
(l) Every email address of the offender.
(2)(a)(i) Failure to register as required in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection
constitutes a violation of this Chapter.
(ii) Knowingly providing false information to any law enforcement officer,
office, or agency required to receive registration information pursuant to the
provisions of this Chapter constitutes a failure to register.
(b) Upon conviction, the offender shall be fined not more than one thousand
dollars and imprisoned for not more than one year with or without hard labor.
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-681 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 85
D. Upon receipt of the registration information as prescribed by the
provisions of this Section, the law enforcement agency shall, by electronic means,
immediately forward the offender's information to the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal
Identification and Information.
E. The offender's registration and notification requirements pursuant to this
Chapter are mandatory and shall not be waived or suspended by any court. Any
order waiving or suspending offender registration and notification requirements shall
be null, void, and of no effect. Any order waiving or suspending registration and
notification requirements shall not be construed to invalidate an otherwise valid
conviction, unless by joint written motion of the district attorney and the offender.
§564.1. Duties of the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information
A.(1) The Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information shall
develop and maintain the central registry known as the Animal Abuse and Neglect
Registry. The registry shall contain the information transmitted to the bureau
pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter. Upon receipt of the registration and
information of any person subject to the provisions of this Chapter, the bureau shall
immediately enter the appropriate information in the public registry. The bureau
shall accept electronically submitted information and registration renewal
information that is received from law enforcement.
(2)(a) The bureau shall provide for public access to the information
contained in the registry, including internet-based access, which shall have field-
search capabilities.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
the following information is exempt from public access:
(i) Social security numbers.
(ii) Telephone numbers, subject to the provisions of Subparagraphs (c) and
(d) of this Paragraph.
(iii) Email addresses.
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-681 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 85
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph,
the registry shall contain the ability to search by telephone numbers, email addresses,
online screen names, or other online identities to provide information to the person
conducting the search regarding whether or not that information has been linked to
a person convicted of an offense that requires registration pursuant to R.S.
15:564(A). This search shall not disclose the name or any other identifying
information about the offender to the person conducting the search, except to identify
that the information has been linked to a person convicted of an offense that requires
registration pursuant to R.S. 15:564(A).
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraphs (b) and (c) of this
Paragraph, the bureau shall, upon request by any person or entity in a manner
prescribed by the bureau, provide a list of telephone numbers, email addresses,
online screen names, static internet protocol addresses, or other online identities of
persons in the Animal Abuse and Neglect Registry for the purpose of identifying and
monitoring a registered user associated with the telephone number, email address,
online screen name, static internet protocol address, or other online identity. The
information provided to the person or entity shall not disclose the name or other
identifying information of the offender that is associated with, or who is using, any
of the telephone numbers, email addresses, online screen names, static internet
protocol addresses, or other online identities in the provided list.
(e) The bureau shall maintain an Animal Abuse and Neglect Notification and
Registration website on the internet, which shall contain a disclaimer informing the
public of all of the following:
(i) The information contained on the site is obtained from offenders, and the
bureau does not guarantee its accuracy or completeness.
(ii) Members of the public shall not use the information to harass or threaten
offenders or members of their families.
(iii) Harassment, stalking, or threats against offenders or their families are
prohibited and are violations of Louisiana criminal laws.
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-681 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 85
B. The bureau shall develop and maintain the registry as to provide for
automatic email notifications at the time when an offender begins residence,
employment, or school attendance within a certain geographic radius or zip code.
This function of the registry shall allow members of the public and organizations to
request automatic email notifications to be sent to an email address provided by the
requestor for a certain geographic radius or zip code specified by the requestor.
C. The bureau is hereby designated as the state agency to receive information
regarding an out-of-state person who establishes a residence in this state pursuant to
R.S. 15:542.1.3 and has been convicted of a similar offense as those that require
registration pursuant to R.S. 15:564(A).
D. The bureau may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Chapter.
E.(1) The bureau shall provide the capability for a social networking website
to compare the database of registered users of that social networking website to the
list of email addresses, instant message addresses, and other similar online identifiers
of persons in the Animal Abuse and Neglect Registry.
(2) An entity operating a social networking website that compares its
database of registered users to the list of email addresses, instant message addresses,
and other online identifiers of persons in the registry shall first provide to the bureau
all of the following information:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the entity operating the
social networking website.
(b) The legal nature and corporate status of the entity operating the social
networking website.
(c) A statement signed by the chief legal officer of the social networking
website to the effect that the information obtained from the registry shall not be
disclosed for any purpose other than for comparing the database of registered users
of the social networking website against the list of email addresses, instant message
addresses, and other online identifiers of persons contained in the state registry to
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-681 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 85
protect animals from abuse or neglect, and that disclosure of this information for any
other purpose may be unlawful.
(d) The name, address, and telephone number of a natural person who is
authorized to receive service of process for the entity operating the social networking
website.
(3) After complying with the requirements of Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection, the entity operating the social networking website may screen users or
compare its database of registered users to the list of email addresses, instant
message addresses, and other online identifiers of persons contained in the Animal
Abuse or Neglect Registry as frequently as the bureau allows for the purpose of
identifying, monitoring, or removing a registered user associated with electronic mail
addresses, instant message addresses, and other online identifiers contained in the
registry.
(4) An entity operating a social networking website which complies with the
provisions of Paragraphs (2) and (3) of this Subsection and its directors, officers,
employees, or agents may claim such compliance as a defense to a claim for liability
arising against the entity or those persons.
§564.2. Duration of registration and notification period
A person required to register pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter shall
comply with this requirement and keep current his registration information for one
year from the date of initial registration in this state for a first offense and ten years
for a second or subsequent offense, unless the underlying conviction is reversed, set
aside, or vacated.
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-681 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 85